Utah statutes.
4-31-10.   Imported swine -- Quarantine period -- Exceptions to quarantine.
(1)  No person shall load swine for shipment to or within this state, except
those for immediate slaughter, until the car is cleaned and disinfected in
accordance with departmental rules.
(2)  All swine shipped into the state, except those for immediate slaughter,
shall, upon arrival at their final destination in the state, be kept in a
clean and disinfected place away from other swine for a period of 18 days.
(3)  The owner or consignee of such swine shall notify the commissioner of the
date of their arrival and the place where they are being held.
